Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 1. Powers and Miscellaneous Matters
§ 15-1-103.
General powers of governing bodies.

The governing bodies of all cities and towns may:

Sue and be sued;

Have and use a common seal;

Purchase and hold real and personal property for their use including real estate sold for taxes;

Sell, convey and lease any estate owned and make any orders respecting it deemed to be in their best interest;

Perform all acts in relation to the property and concerns of the city or town necessary to the exercise of its corporate powers;

Receive bequests, gifts and donations of all kinds of property in fee simple, or in trust for public, charitable or other purposes and do all things necessary to carry out their intended purpose;

Control the finances of the corporation, including providing by ordinance for:

The preparation, maintenance and retention of required records and accounts;

Any required reports to the director of the state department of audit’s office; and

If deemed necessary the preparation of independent audits of the financial condition of the city or town, which shall be conducted by a certified public accountant or a public accountant who has been in the practice of public accounting for a period of five (5) years as a principal.

Appropriate money by ordinance only and pay all necessary expenses, including supplies, salaries of employees and debts;

Levy and collect special assessments against persons or property to the extent allowed by the constitution and the law;

Borrow money on the credit of the corporation for corporate purposes as allowed by the constitution and the laws and issue warrants and bonds therefor in such amounts and forms and on such conditions as they determine;

Take all necessary action to plan, construct or otherwise improve, modify, repair, maintain and regulate the use of streets, including the regulation of any structures thereunder, alleys, any bridges, parks, public grounds, cemeteries and sidewalks;

In the manner provided in W.S.

15-7-301

through

15-7-305

vacate from public use any property acquired or held for park purposes, if:

through (C) Repealed by Laws 1984, ch. 15, § 2.

(D)

The city or town has held title to the property for more than ten (10) years and no substantial use has been made thereof for park purposes; or

(E)

The property will be used for public school or public educational purposes after the vacation.

License, tax and regulate any business whatsoever conducted or trafficked in within the limits of the city or town for the purpose of raising revenue, and any license taxes imposed shall be uniform in respect to the class of business upon which imposed;

Regulate or prohibit the running at large within the city limits of any animals, impose a license fee for the keeping or harboring of dogs and establish and provide for the operation of a pound;

Regulate, license, tax or prohibit saloons and shooting galleries or places;

Suppress or prohibit:

All gambling games or devices except antique gambling devices as defined in W.S. 6-7-101(a)(x) and authorize the destruction thereof;

Houses of prostitution and other disorderly houses and punish the keeper thereof and persons resorting thereto; and

Other disorderly and vicious practices or conduct.

Restrain and punish vagrants, mendicants and prostitutes;

Regulate, prevent or suppress riots, disturbances, disorderly assemblies or parades, or any other conduct which disturbs or jeopardizes the public health, safety, peace or morality, in any public or private place;

Declare and abate nuisances and impose fines upon parties who create, continue or permit nuisances to exist;

Compel the attendance of witnesses for the investigation of matters before it and the presiding officer may administer the requisite oaths;

Purchase, lease or rent land within or without the corporate limits for the deposit of refuse matter, govern the use of the land and make reasonable rules and requirements for hauling refuse;

Establish and regulate parks, zoological gardens and recreation areas within the city limits and upon land owned, leased or controlled outside of the city limits provided:

The municipal court of the city or town has jurisdiction to punish any violator of the ordinances of the city or town governing those areas;

The state game and fish commission is authorized to furnish to any city or town any game or animals requested, and the city or town shall pay the necessary expenses.

Provide for the organization, support and equipping of a fire department and:

Prescribe rules, regulations and penalties for governing the department;

Establish regulations for the prevention of and extinguishing of fires;

Make cooperative agreements or execute contracts for fire protection in accordance with W.S.

15-1-121

.

Prevent the dangerous construction and condition of chimneys, fireplaces and any other heating appliance or apparatus used in and about dwellings, factories and other buildings, and cause any such dangerous condition or appliance to be removed or replaced in a safe condition, regulate and prevent the carrying on of manufacturing likely to cause fires and prevent the deposit of ashes in unsafe places;

Prescribe the thickness, strength and manner of constructing any buildings and the construction of fire escapes therein, and provide for their inspection;

Provide for the repair, removal or destruction of any dangerous building or enclosure;

Define fire limits and prescribe limits within which no building may be constructed except of brick, stone, or other incombustible material, without permission and cause the destruction or removal of any building constructed or repaired in violation of any ordinance;

Regulate or prevent the storage, use and transportation of any combustible or explosive material within the corporate limits or within a given distance thereof;

Appoint a board of health and prescribe its powers and duties and:

Establish quarantine ordinances;

Own and regulate convalescent homes, rest homes and hospitals;

Contract for treatment and preventive services for the mentally ill, substance abuser and developmentally disabled as provided in W.S.

35-1-611

through

35-1-628

.

Divide the city or town into suitable districts for establishing a system of drainage including surface water drainage, sanitary sewers and water mains and:

Provide and regulate the construction, repair and use of sewers and drains;

Provide penalties for violations of regulations;

Assess against the property concerned any penalty or costs and expenses in compliance with regulations.

Take any action to establish, alter and regulate as deemed necessary the channels of streams, water courses and any other public water sources or supplies within the city;

Establish, maintain and in a manner the governing body determines provide for the housing of public libraries and reading rooms and in connection therewith or separately public museums and:

Purchase books and other appropriate material;

Purchase and receive as gifts or on loan any books, pictures, articles or artifacts relating to the history, resources and development of the United States and its parts and lands;

Place a museum temporarily in charge of donors; and

Receive donations and bequests for the museum, in trust or otherwise, and make contracts and regulations for the care, protection and government thereof.

Grant franchises for such terms as the governing body deems proper to any utility company, and, for communication companies, in accordance with W.S.

15-1-131

, provided no franchise may be entered into with any person in which that person is given an exclusive right for any purpose whatsoever and:

Grant to any franchisee utility company the privilege to install and maintain necessary installations under or over any streets, alleys or avenues;

Contract for a specified time period with any franchisee electric light or gas company for the necessary energy and service for the lighting of streets, public buildings or other requirements of the city or town;

Upon renewal or initial grant or renewal after condemnation of a franchise, may provide in the franchise that the franchisee shall furnish a gas distribution system through which any supplier, including the franchisee, may sell and distribute natural gas as provided by subsection (b) of this section, to any person served by the distribution system, provided that before any city or town implements this subparagraph, the question of whether or not to do so shall be submitted to and approved by a majority of the electors of the city or town voting on the question at a one-time election called for that purpose.

Establish and regulate a police department, pass ordinances relating to the department and adopt job descriptions for all department personnel;

Exercise the power of eminent domain and take property for public use within and without the city limits for any necessary or authorized public purpose as defined by W.S. 1-26-801(c);

Require all buildings to be numbered by the owners, lessees, occupants or agents and in case of failure to comply with such requirements, cause the numbering to be done and assess the costs against the property or premises numbered;

In addition to the appointed officers and employees provided by law, establish other positions as are necessary for the efficient operation of the city or town and:

Prescribe duties and rules of all appointees;

Determine working conditions or pay scales and supplementary benefits, as long as those provisions are not in conflict with existing statutes;

During an emergency or special conditions warranting, make additional temporary appointments;

Specify by ordinance that if any person is removed from office for incompetency, neglect of duty or otherwise for cause, the charges against that person shall be specified and the person removed shall be provided an opportunity for a hearing on the charges under procedures established in the ordinance;

Make the cause of removal a matter of record.

Cause compilations, codifications and comprehensive revisions to be made of all ordinances in force and provide for their distribution, sale and exchange;

Lease lands owned or possessed outside the corporate limits which contain caves, caverns, or other natural formations to any person for the development and use of the natural formations on terms and conditions approved by the governing body;

With written permission of the landowner or governmental agency involved, reclaim for beneficial use substandard lands by filling excavations and other depressions with refuse from the cities and towns, provided the deposit of refuse and the reclamation of the lands shall be done in a manner approved by the landowner, adjoining landowners and in accordance with any applicable laws or ordinances;

Adopt ordinances, resolutions and regulations, including regulations not in conflict with this act and necessary for the health, safety and welfare of the city or town, necessary to give effect to the powers conferred by this act and, except as provided by paragraph (xlvi) of this subsection, enforce all ordinances by imposing fines not exceeding seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or imprisonment not exceeding six (6) months, or both. The governing body of a city or town may by ordinance impose a term of probation for battery which may exceed the maximum term of imprisonment established for the offense provided the term of probation, together with any extension thereof, shall in no case exceed one (1) year;

Subject to subsection (d) of this section, take any action necessary to acquire any needed or useful property, or to construct, maintain, repair or replace any lawful improvement, development, project or other activity of any kind, or to participate, join or cooperate with other governments or political subdivisions, or departments or agencies thereof, for which funds may be borrowed from, granted or made available in whole or in part, on a matching basis or otherwise, by the United States of America or the state of Wyoming, or any subdivision, department or agency of either;

License and regulate pawnbrokers and junk or secondhand dealers and provide for the examination of premises and business property of such persons pursuant to law for the purpose of discovering stolen property;

Take into custody abandoned, or junk motor vehicles and parts or remains thereof which are nuisances and are on public property or on public streets, alleys and ways and:

Remove and store the vehicles or parts at the expense of the owner;

Permit redemption of the vehicles or parts;

If not redeemed after giving public notice sell the vehicles or parts without warranty;

Pay expenses from the sale; and

After lapse of a reasonable length of time, deposit unclaimed proceeds from the sale of vehicles or parts into the general fund of the municipality.

Contract with nonprofit corporations, hospitals and clinics to provide human services for persons within its jurisdiction;

Adopt ordinances establishing pretreatment standards and requirements for municipal waste water collection systems and provide for enforcement of the standards and requirements through:

Injunctive relief; and

The assessment against industrial users of civil or criminal penalties for violations of, or noncompliance with, the pretreatment standards and requirements, provided the civil penalty shall not be less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) and shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) a day for each day of violation. The proceeds of any civil penalty imposed by a district court under any ordinance adopted pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited in the general fund of the city or town.

By ordinance, prohibit or authorize and regulate the operation of golf carts as defined under W.S. 31-5-102(a)(lxi) on public streets and roadways within the corporate boundaries of the city or town;

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 22, § 2.

Unless specifically prohibited by statute, accept negotiable paper in payment of any tax, assessment, license, permit, fee, fine or other money owing to the city or town or collectible by the city or town on behalf of the state or other unit of government, or in payment of any bail deposit or other trust deposit. As used in this paragraph, negotiable paper means money orders, paper arising from the use of a lender credit card as defined in W.S. 40-14-140(a)(ix), checks and drafts, including, without limitation, sales drafts and checks and drafts signed by a holder of a lender credit card issued by a bank maintaining a revolving loan account as defined in W.S.

40-14-308

, for lender credit card holders. The acceptance of negotiable paper by the governing body under this subsection shall be in accordance with and subject to the same terms and conditions provided by W.S.

18-3-505

. Any fees assessed for processing a credit card payment may be borne by the governing body of the city or town or person tendering payment. Any fees assessed for processing a credit card payment collected on behalf of the state shall be borne by the governing body of the city or town or person tendering payment and not by the state;

Appoint special municipal officers, who are not certified as peace officers, to issue citations to individuals for the limited purpose of enforcing ordinances, resolutions and regulations in the areas of animal control, parking and municipal code enforcement. Special municipal officers are not law enforcement officers:

For purposes of employee benefits provided in title 9 of Wyoming statutes;

Are not peace officers for purposes of title 6 or title 7 of Wyoming statutes;

Are not peace officers for purposes of W.S.

1-39-112

;

Shall not be required to carry a firearm;

Shall not have the power of arrest;

Shall not be issued a peace officer’s badge; and

Shall not represent themselves to be peace officers.

Any franchise granted pursuant to subparagraph (a)(xxxiii)(C) of this section is subject to the following:

The franchise agreement shall specify who is responsible for deliverability;

The distribution system shall continue to be a public utility whose charges are regulated by the public service commission. The charges shall reflect the reasonable nongas costs subject to management audit as the public service commission deems necessary plus a reasonable return on investment;

Any city or town or its authorized representative shall act as an agent for any person served by the system in negotiating terms and conditions for the supply of natural gas to that person, and the franchisee distribution system shall accept for delivery to any person served by the system, natural gas from any supplier;

The public service commission shall designate a place or places in the vicinity of the distribution system for the acceptance of natural gas not supplied by franchisee;

The public service commission shall adopt and enforce minimum quality standards for all gas delivered to the distribution system. These standards shall reflect the practices of the operators of the distribution system unless good cause is shown for different standards. The standards shall be designed to facilitate the commingling of gas from different suppliers;

As soon as there are at least two (2) suppliers offering natural gas to all customers served by the franchisee and as soon as the additional supplier or suppliers are capable of delivering gas in at least one-third (1/3) of the volume required by the entire distribution system provided that the public service commission finds that the suppliers own or control, and have committed to guaranteed delivery, reserves of natural gas sufficient to supply ten (10) years of demand at that level, then all persons supplying gas shall have the authority to set their own prices. The proposed supplier has the burden of proving adequate reserves and deliverability. The Wyoming oil and gas commission shall report to the public service commission on the adequacy and deliverability when a utility gas supply is proposed to be displaced under this act;

Subject to the availability of pipeline capacity and the requirements of federal law and regulations the public service commission may, after notice and hearing if necessary, designate any point in the state on a gas pipeline operated for the purpose of delivering gas to the distribution system or its parent or subsidiary company as a point for receipt of gas to the system and regulate the charges for shipping gas from that point to the system. If a pipeline has insufficient capacity the public service commission consistent with W.S.

30-5-125

may require it to accept gas that has a lower price to the consumer in preference to higher price gas. The public service commission may impose any conditions or requirements pursuant to this subsection that are necessary to protect the public health, safety and welfare, to ensure the efficient operation of the natural gas distribution and supply system and to ensure the lowest possible price to retail customers, including but not limited to proper assignment of costs of connecting suppliers to the system;

When a city renews or grants a franchise for the supply of natural gas under subparagraph (a)(xxxiii)(C) of this section, the public service commission may require that the distribution of gas in surrounding unincorporated areas also be made subject to the terms of the same franchise;

If a distribution system has only one (1) supplier of natural gas all prices charged in that franchise are subject to W.S.

37-2-121

and

37-2-122

;

All suppliers of gas to the distribution system shall annually report to the public service commission the annual consumption of natural gas by their customers of record at the date of the report and their natural gas reserves. If their natural gas reserves are less than a five (5) year supply, the public service commission may forbid any supplier from serving new customers until the reserves are equal to a five (5) year supply for all customers;

Any supplier entering the system under this subsection is liable for injuries, damages or other losses to the extent to which the injuries, damages or other losses are proximately caused by the supplier’s operations within the system and are due to failure of the supplier to exercise that standard of care which a reasonable, prudent person would exercise under the same or similar circumstances to avoid an undue risk of harm or are due to the supplier’s failure to deliver contracted amounts of natural gas.

Any provision in a gas purchase contract which contains or creates an indefinite escalator clause, otherwise known as a “favored nation treaty” provision, is contrary to the public policy of the state and is void and unenforceable if:

The contract is to sell gas to the holders of a municipality franchise which supplies retail customers in the state;

The contract provides for the sale in the state of gas produced within the state;

The contract gas price is in excess of the general market price which would otherwise exist in the absence of the indefinite escalator clause; and

The higher price resulting from the application of the escalator clause is not required by any enforceable provision of statutes or regulations enacted or adopted pursuant to the Natural Gas Policy Act of 1978 or other appropriate statutes and regulations of the United States.

Before the governing body of a city or town enters into an agreement to borrow money from the United States of America or from the state of Wyoming, or from any subdivision, agency or department of either, to fund a public improvement project to be repaid solely from revenues generated by the enterprise with which the financed project is associated, the proposal to enter into the loan agreement shall be submitted to and approved by the electors of the city or town in the same manner and pursuant to the same procedures as provided for bond issues under the Political Subdivision Bond Election Law, if the total amount to be borrowed for the project exceeds the greater of:

Five million dollars ($5,000,000.00); or

An amount calculated by multiplying the number of individuals to be served by the proposed public improvement project times one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200.00).

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-3; Laws 1967, ch. 117, § 1; ch. 151, § 1; 1969, ch. 120, § 1; 1973, ch. 206, § 1; 1977, ch. 45, § 4; 1979, ch. 85, § 1; ch. 155, § 2; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 101, § 1; ch. 174, § 2; 1984, ch. 15, § 1; ch. 34, § 2; 1985, ch. 172, §§ 1, 3; 1991, ch. 206, § 1; ch. 215, § 1; ch. 240, § 1; 1995, ch. 118, § 2; 1996, ch. 75, § 1; 1997, ch. 59, § 1; 1998, ch. 84, § 1; 1999, ch. 22, §§ 1, 2; ch. 107, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; ch. 130, § 1; 2007, ch. 50, § 1; ch. 67, § 1; ch. 139, § 2; 2009, ch. 138, § 1; 2020 ch. 85, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

For authority of mayor to enforce health ordinances within five miles of corporate limits of city, see §

15-3-202

.

As to public parks generally, see §§

15-7-301

to

15-7-305

.

As to waterworks franchises to private corporations, see §§

15-7-701

to

15-7-708

.

As to urban renewal, see §§

15-9-101

to

15-9-137

.

As to housing, see §§

15-10-101

to

15-10-117

.

As to officers authorized to administer oaths generally, see §

1-2-102

.

As to eminent domain generally, see §§

1-26-501

through

1-26-817

and Rule 71.1, W.R.C.P.

As to public indecency, see §

6-4-201

.

As to disturbances of public order, see §

6-6-101

et seq.

As to offenses tending to breach the peace, see §§

6-6-101

to

6-6-307

.

As to nuisances, see §§

6-6-201

through

6-6-209

.

As to weapons offenses, see §

6-8-101

et seq.

As to power of cities and towns to require tuberculin tests of dairy cattle, see § 11-19-205.

As to prohibition against swine, goats or domestic elk running at large, see §

11-26-101

.

As to dogs generally, see §§

11-31-102

through

11-31-108

.

As to municipal and district health departments generally, see §§

35-1-301

to

35-1-309

.

As to the division of community programs of the department of health and the treatment of mental illness and other disabilities, see §§

35-1-611

to

35-1-628

and notes thereto.

As to communicable diseases generally, see §§

35-4-101

to

35-4-139

.

For additional authority of cities and towns to regulate nuisances, see §

35-10-408

.

The 2004 amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment, by ch. 42, § 1, in (a)(xxii)(A), substituted “municipal court” for “police court.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The second 2004 amendment, by ch. 130, § 1, in (a)(xxix)(C), substituted “35-1-628” for “35-1-625”; and in (a)(xli) inserted “of this subsection” following “provided by paragraph (xlvi).”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

See the conflicting legislation note. This section has been set out incorporating changes made by both 2004 acts.

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment by ch. 50, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, added (a)(l).

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 67, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(xii), added (E), redesignated part of the existing provisions of (xii) as (D), and made related changes.

The third 2007 amendment, by ch. 139, § 2, effective July 1, 2007, inserted “as defined by W.S. 1-26-801(c)” in (a)(xxxv).

While none of the amendments gave effect to the others, all have been set out as above.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(xv), deleted “pool halls, any tables kept for hire, bowling alleys” preceding “and shooting galleries.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (a)(xxxiii) added “and, for communication companies, in accordance with W.S.

15-1-131

” following “any utility company.”

Natural Gas Policy Act. —

The Natural Gas Policy Act of 1978, referred to in subsection (c)(iv), is found at 15 U.S.C. § 3301 et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 15-1-101(a)(xv).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Cities have only such powers as are granted by legislature,

and they cannot challenge the legality of legislation passed by their creators. Wyoming State Treas. v. City of Rawlins, 510 P.2d 301,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1973).

Municipalities can exercise only those powers of government which are expressly or impliedly conferred. City of Buffalo v. Joslyn, 527 P.2d 1106,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 245

(Wyo. 1974).

And section does not alter general rule. —

Subsection 29 of former § 15-160, W.S. 1957 (similar to subsection (a)(xli) of this section), did not liberalize general rule that municipality possesses powers which are necessarily or fairly implied from powers expressly granted. Whipps v. Greybull, 56 Wyo. 355, 109 P.2d 805,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1941).

Anti-abortion demonstration activities. —

Town sought to restrict an anti-abortion organization's demonstration activities in and around the town square during the Boy Scouts'
annual Elk Fest. The town's asserted interest in protecting its youth gave it a sufficient stake in the outcome of the proceedings to allow it standing to bring an ex parte petition for a temporary restraining order against the organization.
Operation Save Am. v. City of Jackson, 2012 WY 51, 275 P.3d 438,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 2012).

Fireworks. —

Nothing in the amended §

35-10-205

or the relatively newly enacted §

35-10-208

does damage to the fundamental proposition that the sales and use of fireworks may be regulated by cities within five miles of the city limits. Ford v. City of Riverton, 919 P.2d 636,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 1996).

Fixed rate formula in power contract held reasonable. —

Fixed rate formula agreed upon in a power contract between municipalities organizing an agency under the Wyoming Joint Powers Act, §§

16-1-102

through

16-1-109

, to produce and distribute electric power to their inhabitants was reasonable. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Limited grant of franchise to utility. —

Even if a city may lawfully grant some franchise to a utility outside its city limits, it cannot be of any exclusive nature precluding it from extending its own lines into its own subdivisions, regularly annexed. Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. Gillette, 584 P.2d 995,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1978) (decided prior to 1980 revision).

Ordinance imposing penalties upon gas utilities operating without license or franchise was void

and could not be sustained under any residual police power of the city. K N Energy, Inc. v. Casper, 755 P.2d 207,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 1988).

Procedure for condemnation by city prescribed by rules. —

A city has authority to exercise the right of eminent domain under paragraph (xxxv) of subsection (a); however, the procedure for condemnation provided by that paragraph has been superseded by later legislative enactment prescribing that Rule 71.1, W.R.C.P. will be followed. Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. City of Gillette, 584 P.2d 995,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1978). See §

1-26-501

.

Acquisition of land for federal agency by public subscription not ultra vires. —

A town did not commit an ultra vires act where it acquired title to a tract of land with money raised by public subscription for the benefit of a federal agency in exchange for $75,000.00 credit on a sewer system for the entire town. Amick v. Elwood, 77 Wyo. 269, 314 P.2d 944,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1957) (decided under former § 15-160, W.S. 1957).

Borrowing for light and power plant. —

Town council, without approval by vote of the people, does not have authority to borrow money to pay for municipal light and power plant and to issue bonds payable solely from revenues accruing from operation of plant. Whipps v. Greybull, 56 Wyo. 355, 109 P.2d 805,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1941).

Power to construct public utility plant and to borrow large sum of money necessary to pay for it cannot reasonably be implied from power to provide for lighting streets and erection of lampposts. Whipps v. Greybull, 56 Wyo. 355, 109 P.2d 805,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1941).

Act of 1907 authorizing municipalities to construct light and power plants granted new power and was not merely providing method of exercising power that already existed. Whipps v. Greybull, 56 Wyo. 355, 109 P.2d 805,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1941).

Borrowing for water project. —

Legislature did not intend for financing of municipal water project to be considered a “bond,” and therefore there was no statutory requirement for an election prior to town's incurring debt. Cooper v. Town of Pinedale, 1 P.3d 1197,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2000).

Taxation of each lot as stated amount. —

Town council held not authorized to pass ordinance taxing each lot a stated amount, regardless of value, to furnish water for irrigation. Town Council of Hudson v. Board of Comm'rs, 37 Wyo. 160, 259 P. 1051,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1927).

Provision of ordinance regulating barbershops,

providing that shops must open not earlier than 8 a.m. and close not later than 6 p.m., held unreasonable and void. State ex rel. Newman v. City of Laramie, 40 Wyo. 74, 275 P. 106,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1929).

Park-land dedication ordinances. —

The broad powers delegated by the legislature can fairly encompass the power to adopt a park-land dedication ordinance. A city can require the payment of a sum in lieu of park-land dedication in order to lessen the impact and pressure on park facilities that results from the influx of inhabitants caused by a new development. The limitation on this power is the requirement that any fees collected in lieu of land dedication must be earmarked to accounts for the purpose of acquiring needed park land and maintenance of existing park facilities. Coulter v. Rawlins, 662 P.2d 888,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1983).

Territorial scope of ordinance's effect for health purposes. —

For health purposes, a city may make an ordinance effective for a distance of five miles beyond the city limits. Haddenham v. Laramie, 648 P.2d 551,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 362

(Wyo. 1982).

City without power to establish highway through park where no express legislative authority given. —

Where land owned by city had been dedicated by it for park purposes and there was not express authority from the legislature to establish a highway through the park, the city was without power to do so since the property was held by the city for the benefit of the people as a whole. They were represented by the legislature which had sole authority concerning it. Rayor v. Cheyenne, 63 Wyo. 72, 178 P.2d 115,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1947).

Estoppel to deny validity of street vacation. —

Where a town, in consideration of a lot owner's waiver of his rights under a contract to another tract of land, vacated a part of the street in front of his lots, and had built a public library on the property surrendered by him, so that it could not restore his former situation, it is estopped to deny validity of the vacation of the street. Rohrbaugh v. Mokler, 26 Wyo. 514, 188 P. 448,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1920).

Defects in streets. —

Towns, having exclusive control of streets, are liable for damages resulting from failure to use reasonable care in keeping them in reasonably safe condition for public travel, and in safeguarding, by proper signal, places of danger thereon. Opitz v. Newcastle, 35 Wyo. 358, 249 P. 799,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1926).

City may levy occupation tax. —

Subsection (a)(xiii) authorized city to pass an ordinance levying an occupation tax, and the fact that this section omitted the phrase “for purpose of raising revenue” will not negate that authority. City of Rawlins v. Frontier Ref. Co., 396 P.2d 740,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1964).

Description of tax. —

Where license tax imposed by ordinance was purely for revenue purposes, city claiming no right under its police power to regulate defendant's business, and required license, as a receipt for tax, being only an incident, a reference in the statute and ordinance to the tax as a “license tax,” instead of denominating it an “excise,” “occupation,” or “privilege” tax, was immaterial. City of Sheridan v. Litman, 32 Wyo. 14, 228 P. 628,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1924).

Regulation may not violate commerce clause nor discriminate against nonresidents. —

A town ordinance prohibiting nonresident persons from selling by sample and taking orders for the goods of their principals, to be delivered in the town, without first procuring a license, by providing that the ordinance shall not apply to those who sell exclusively to regular merchants of such town is in conflict with the United States constitution, conferring on congress power to regulate commerce among the states; and is void as discrimination against nonresidents of the state. Clements v. Town of Casper, 4 Wyo. 494, 35 P. 472,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(1894).

But nuisances may be abated. —

Municipalities have authority to decide what constitutes nuisances and to abate and punish under ordinances prescribing such nuisances. Town of Green River v. Fuller Brush Co., 65 F.2d 112, 1933 U.S. App. LEXIS 2934 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1933).

Including practice of going in private residences to sell goods. —

An ordinance declaring that the practice of going in and upon private residences by solicitors, peddlers, itinerant merchants, etc., for the purpose of soliciting orders for, or selling goods, wares and merchandise, is a nuisance and imposing a penalty is valid, and not in violation of any constitutional or statutory provision. Town of Green River v. Bunger, 50 Wyo. 52, 58 P.2d 456,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1936).

Allegation of possession of business license required. —

A petition for mandamus to compel the authorities to grant permission to change location of a licensed business, which also requires a county license, without alleging that county license is possessed for the new location is demurrable (now subject to a motion to dismiss. See Rule 12, W.R.C.P.). State v. Town Council, 25 Wyo. 211, 167 P. 982,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(1917).

Comparison of ordinance as to wandering cattle with common-law rule of liability. —

Under modern conditions there is a tendency to revert to the common-law rule of liability as to the damage done by wandering livestock, and this would be appropriately applied to a city passing an ordinance pursuant to subsection 16 of former § 15-686, W.S. 1957 (similar to subsection (a)(xiv) of this section), which would prohibit cattle from wandering at large in city limits. Sowers v. Corthell, 69 Wyo. 215, 240 P.2d 891,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1952).

Sale of intoxicants. —

Any discretion of county commissioners as to issuing liquor license does not include right or power on part of commissioners to refuse issuance of license solely because of opposition to operation of liquor establishments, in view of this and other sections. State ex rel. Rehder v. Board of Comm'rs, 26 Wyo. 75, 177 P. 130,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1919).

Condemnation statutes apply to damage to abutting property. —

Statutes authorizing condemnation by cities of first class apply both to property physically taken and to abutting property indirectly damaged even though some provisions relating to property actually taken cannot be carried out in the latter type of case. Hirt v. Casper, 56 Wyo. 57, 103 P.2d 394,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1940).

Jury trial as to compensation. —

Owner of property condemned for waterworks has the right to a jury trial on the question of compensation, if demanded within the time prescribed by statute. City of Cheyenne v. Edwards, 22 Wyo. 401, 143 P. 356,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1914).

Municipalities have full authority and control over public water and sewerage systems.

Coulter v. Rawlins, 662 P.2d 888,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1983).

Including levy of connection and maintenance charges. —

Wyoming statutory provisions grant a city the power to levy sewer and water connection charges and to charge users of the systems in order to pay the costs of maintaining, operating and expanding them. Coulter v. Rawlins, 662 P.2d 888,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1983).

Local improvements include sewers. —

The power to make “local improvements” includes the power to construct and repair sanitary sewers. Henning v. Consolidated Bldg. & Loan Co., 50 Wyo. 315, 62 P.2d 540,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1936) (decided under former law).

Kinds of sewers. —

In absence of provisions limiting sewers to sanitary sewers, proposed storm ditch to carry off flood waters within city is authorized and general municipal bonds may be issued, since term “sewer” includes both storm and sanitary sewers. Anselmi v. Rock Springs, 53 Wyo. 223, 80 P.2d 419,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1938) (decided under former law).

Appointment of temporary police “commander” held nullity absent emergency. —

Where there is more than sufficient evidence that the appointment of a police “commander” was not made as a temporary appointment and that an emergency did not exist, the appointment is a nullity. City of Rock Springs v. Police Protection Ass'n, 610 P.2d 975,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 261

(Wyo. 1980).

Provision applicable to “at-will” employee. —
